Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202481-1,110
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the State Acceptance of Gifts Act is to provide a procedure for accepting proposed gifts to the state so that the state does not assume responsibility for excessive costs or unnecessary obligations relating to such gifts.

Laws 2024, LB998, § 2.
July 1, 2025